Oklahoma, session 2025, SB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2803.3 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A statement that purports to narrate, describe, report, or
explain an incident or incidents of domestic abuse as defined in
Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes:
1. Made by the victim of domestic abuse to a law enforcement
officer within one (1) week of the incident;
2. On an application for a protective order by the victim of
domestic abuse within one (1) week of the incident; or
3. Given as testimony of the victim of domestic abuse made at a
hearing on application for a protective order,

shall be admissible in pre-trial or post-trial criminal and juvenile
delinquent domestic abuse prosecutions including preliminary
hearings, prosecutive merit hearings, or hearings on the revocation
of probation or acceleration of a deferred judgment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 607 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 607 Page 3